Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-607
State Treasurer; refusal to pay lawful warrant; penalty.

If the State Treasurer shall willfully refuse or neglect to pay any warrant lawfully drawn upon the treasury, when the money for the payment of the same is in the treasury, he shall forfeit and pay fourfold the amount to be recovered by action against the treasurer and his sureties, on his official bond or otherwise. He shall also suffer such punishment as the law may provide.

R.S.1866, c. 4, § 23, p. 26;

R.S.1913, § 5582;

C.S.1922, § 4886;

C.S.1929, § 84-607;

R.S.1943, § 84-607.